District of Columbia statutes.
Transferred

6-711.01

Mayor may correct conditions violative of law; assessment of cost; lien on property; fund to pay costs; summary corrective action of life-or-health threatening condition.

Recodified as § 42-3131.01.

Apr. 14, 1906, 34 Stat. 114, ch. 1626, § 1
Jan. 5, 1980, D.C. Law 3-45, § 2, 26 DCR 2305
June 14, 1980, D.C. Law 3-70, § 7(m), 27 DCR 1776
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-205, § 2, 30 DCR 188
Oct. 20, 1988, D.C. Law 7-177, § 8, 35 DCR 6158
Feb. 27, 1998, D.C. Law 12-52, § 2, 44 DCR 6226
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-201, § 2, 45 DCR 8410

History

This section is referenced in § 6-805, § 6-1503, and § 42-903.

Section References